Massachusetts, session 194th, S2309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs shall regulate
solar-powered mobility networks to encourage the shift from an oil-powered to sustainable
economy. If no commercial enterprise are approved to build such networks within 6 months, the
executive office shall conduct one or more pilot networks. Commercial and pilot networks shall
be granted non exclusive access to rights-of-way if the networks:
(i) are privately-funded construction;
(ii) are privately operated without government subsidies;
(iii) exceed 120 passenger miles per gallon (5 times the efficiency on existing roads) or
equivalent energy efficiency;
of 2

(iv) exceed safety performance of transportation modes already approved for use; and
(v) that are above ground gather more than 2 megawatt-hours of renewable energy per
network mile per typical day.
SECTION 2. The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall promulgate
regulations for solar and renewable energy mobility networks based on the following criteria:
(i) system design, fabrication, installation, safety, insurance and inspection practices
consistent with the American Society for Testing and Materials International Committee F24 on
Amusement Rides and Devices;
(ii) environmental approvals shall be granted to networks exceeding 5 times the
efficiency of existing roads as measured in energy per passenger-mile, and
(iii) networks access may be rejected in writing for other reasons; and
(iv) provided, taxes and fees assessed on solar and renewable energy mobility network
providers, passengers and cargo shall be limited to 5 percent of the gross revenues and shall be
paid to the aggregate rights-of-way holders by the solar or renewable energy mobility network
provider.
of 2